Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1936
Resignation of registered agent.

(a) A registered agent may resign as the registered agent by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State the original and two exact or conformed copies of a statement of resignation. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

(b) After filing the statement the Secretary of State shall mail one copy to the registered office (if not discontinued) and the other copy to the corporation at its principal office as shown in the most recent biennial report filed pursuant to section 21-19,172.

(c) The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 36.